Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2734.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 2 of the Acts of 2023 in Section 40 is hereby amended by striking the words
"March 31, 2025" and inserting in place thereof the following words: -- "March 31, 2026".
of 1